Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-205
Safety regulations; sidewalk structures; powers.

A city of the primary class shall have the power to (1) remove all obstructions from the sidewalk, curbstones, gutters, and crosswalks at the expense of the owners or occupants of the grounds fronting thereon or at the expense of the person placing such obstructions there and (2) regulate the building of bulkheads, cellars, basements, stairways, railways, windows, doorways, awnings, lampposts, awning posts, and all other structures upon or over adjoining excavations through or under the sidewalks of the city.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, VI, p. 128;

R.S.1913, § 4418;

C.S.1922, § 3802;

C.S.1929, § 15-205;

R.S.1943, § 15-205;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 25.

Allowing and regulating entrances to basements through sidewalks is within reasonable discretion of mayor and council. State ex rel. McNerney v. Armstrong, 97 Neb. 343, 149 N.W. 786 (1914).

Where boiler room was constructed under proper authority from city, after maintenance for fifteen years, authorities could not have same removed as a nuisance. Tiernan v. Thorp, 88 Neb. 662, 130 N.W. 280 (1911).

City must keep streets and walks free of obstructions for entire width. Chapman v. City of Lincoln, 84 Neb. 534, 121 N.W. 596 (1909).